Utah statutes.
39-1-27.   Bonds of accountable officers.

All accountable and/or responsible officers of the militia shall give good and sufficient bonds to the state of Utah, in such form and amount as the adjutant general shall determine, conditioned for the faithful performance of their duties. If surety-company bond be required to be given, the premium therefor shall be paid out of the fund appropriated for the National Guard. The adjutant general may require a new bond to be given, if in his opinion the surety upon any existing bond has become insufficient.

